Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

In General

66-25-101. Requirements for record of release.

When a debt secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or by lien retained in a deed of conveyance of land or bill of sale, or other instrument, has been fully paid or satisfied, the mortgagee, transferee, or assignee of the mortgagee or the legal holder of the debt secured by deed of trust or lien, who has received payment or satisfaction of the debt, must satisfy the record by a formal deed of release.

In any county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand six hundred (32,600) nor more than thirty-two thousand seven hundred (32,700), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census the record may be satisfied by entry on the margin of the record of the mortgage, deed of trust, deed or other instrument.

Acts 1907, ch. 473, § 1; Shan., § 3704a1; mod. Code 1932, § 8070; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2501; Acts 1988, ch. 636, § 12; 1990, ch. 902, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Entry of release of lien, fee, §66-21-121.

Marginal release authorized in certain counties, title 66, ch. 25, part 2.

Release of statutory lien, §66-21-106.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-901, 8-902, 9-411, 9-412.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 41; 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 75.

Law Reviews.

Agricultural Lending in the 1980's: An Insurance Company's Perspective (Leif D. Jensen), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 353 (1988).

Tennessee and the Installment Land Contract: A Viable Alternative to the Deed of Trust, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 551 (1991).

66-25-102. Penalty for failure to release.

If the holder of any debt secured by real property situated in this state fails to enter a proper release of record after having been fully paid or satisfied within forty-five (45) days from the receipt of a written request from the party making such payment, including, but not limited to, the maker, the mortgagor, the purchaser of the property covered by such instrument or any closing agent or attorney who has collected and transmitted funds for such payment, the holder of the debt shall forfeit to the party making such request the sum of one hundred dollars ($100).

If the indebtedness is not released within the forty-five-day period provided in subsection (a), the party having requested the release shall again request the release, and, if after thirty (30) days from the second request, the indebtedness has not been released, the holder shall forfeit to the party making the request a sum not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

In the event suit is instituted to collect either or both of the forfeitures, the holder shall also be liable to the party instituting suit for all reasonable expenses, attorney fees, and the court costs incurred in the action.

Acts 1907, ch. 473, § 1; Shan., § 3704a1; mod. Code 1932, § 8070; Acts 1977, ch. 260, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2502; Acts 1994, ch. 718, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for failure to release statutory lien, §66-21-106.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 41; 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 75.

Law Reviews.

Agricultural Lending in the 1980's: An Insurance Company's Perspective (Leif D. Jensen), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 353 (1988).

Tennessee and the Installment Land Contract: A Viable Alternative to the Deed of Trust, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 551 (1991).

66-25-103. Entry of partial payments.

The mortgagee, or the assignee or the transferee of a debt secured by such instrument, who has accepted partial payments, on request in writing of a judgment creditor or other creditor of the mortgagor having a lien or claim on the property covered by the lien, or the party making such payment, including, but not limited to, the maker, the mortgagor, the purchaser of the property covered by such instrument, any closing agent or attorney who has collected and transmitted funds for such payment, shall execute and record an instrument of partial or full release, giving the date and the amount of the payment or payments.

In any county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand six hundred (32,600) nor more than thirty-two thousand seven hundred (32,700), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census the mortgagee, or the assignee or the transferee of a debt secured by such instrument, who has accepted partial payments, on request in writing of a judgment creditor or other creditor of the mortgagor having a lien or claim on the property covered by the lien, or the party making such payment, including, but not limited to, the maker, the mortgagor, the purchaser of the property covered by such instrument, any closing agent or attorney who has collected and transmitted funds for such payment, shall execute and record a statement of partial release in the manner and form provided in part 2 of this chapter for a full release, giving the date and amount of such partial payment or payments.

The mortgagee, or the assignee or the transferee of a debt secured by real property who has accepted partial payments pursuant to an agreement to release a portion or portions of the property securing the lien of such instrument on request in writing of the party making such payment, including, but not limited to, the maker, the mortgagor, the purchaser of the property covered by such instrument or any closing agent or attorney who has collected and transmitted funds for such payment shall execute and record a formal partial release deed.

If for thirty (30) days after receipt of the written request set forth in subsections (a) and (b), the mortgagee, or the assignee or transferee of a debt so secured arbitrarily or unreasonably fails to record the statement or partial deed of release set out in subsections (a) and (b), such person shall forfeit to the party making such request the sum of one hundred dollars ($100). If the indebtedness is not released within the thirty-day period, the party having requested the release shall again request the release, and, if after thirty (30) days from the second request, the indebtedness has not been released, the holder shall forfeit to the party making the request a sum not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

In the event suit is instituted to collect either or both of the forfeitures, the holder shall also be liable to the party instituting suit for all reasonable expenses, attorney fees, and the court costs incurred in the action.

Acts 1907, ch. 473, § 2; Shan., § 3704a2; mod. Code 1932, § 8071; Acts 1977, ch. 260, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2503; Acts 1988, ch. 636, § 13; Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 9-411.

66-25-104. Right to forfeiture not lost by transfer of property.

The right of action for forfeiture provided by §§66-25-102 and66-25-103 shall be considered as a personal right, and shall not be lost or waived by the sale of the property covered by the mortgage, or deed of trust, or other lien before a demand was made for a release on the records.

Acts 1907, ch. 473, § 4; Shan., § 3704a4; mod. Code 1932, § 8072; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2504.

66-25-105. Partial or full payment — Extent of satisfaction and discharge.

A partial or full payment to the mortgage lender of record on a debt secured by a mortgage or deed of trust shall be a satisfaction and discharge against the mortgagee, or the assignee or transferee of a debt secured by such instrument, as to the amount of such payment.

Acts 1999, ch. 95, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-25-105 was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 636, § 14.

66-25-106 — 66-25-114. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§66-25-106 —66-25-114 (Acts 1883, ch. 253, §§ 1-4; 1911, ch. 67, §§ 1, 2; Code 1932, §§ 8066-8069, 8074-8084; Shan., §§ 3701-3704; Acts 1965, ch. 205, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-2505 — 64-2519), concerning release of liens created by written instruments, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 636, § 14.

66-25-115. Costs paid by lienor.

All costs of making entry of partial or entire payments upon the record, or for registering a formal release, shall be paid by the holder of the debt secured by the mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien.

Acts 1907, ch. 473, § 3; Shan., § 3704a3; mod. Code 1932, § 8073; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2520.

66-25-116. Release or modification of lien by holder of indebtedness.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, any mortgage, deed of trust, deed, or other instrument securing a debt, may be released or modified by the legal holder of the debt secured thereby without the necessity of execution of the release instrument, marginal release, or modification instrument or joinder therein by the trustee under a deed of trust or by other party holding legal title similar to that of the trustee under a deed of trust.

Acts 1996, ch. 670, § 1.

Law Reviews.

1996 Real Estate Legislation: What You Don't Know Can Hurt You (William R. Bruce), 32 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1996).